bg-BG: Тип конструкция на фитила: Със сърцевина (памук); Със сърцевина (хартия); Със сърцевина (цинк); Без сърцевина; Плоско оплетен; Коноп; Кръгло оплетен; Квадратно оплетен; Дървен (усилващ/двуслоен); Дървен (еднослоен); Друго
fr: Type de mèche: Avec âme (coton); Avec âme (papier); Avec âme (zinc); Sans âme; Tressée plate; Chanvre; Tressée ronde; Tressée carrée; En bois (double épaisseur/renforcée); En bois (simple épaisseur); Autre
ro-RO: Tip de construcție a fitilului: Cu miez (bumbac); Cu miez (hârtie); Cu miez (zinc); Fără miez; Împletit plat; Cânepă; Împletit rotund; Împletit pătrat; Lemn (booster/strat dublu); Lemn (un singur strat); Altele
en: Wick construction type: Cored (cotton); Cored (paper); Cored (zinc); Coreless; Flat braided; Hemp; Round braided; Square braided; Wooden (booster/double-ply); Wooden (single-ply); Other
nb: Konstruksjonstype for veke: Med kjerne (bomull); Med kjerne (papir); Med kjerne (sink); Uten kjerne; Flatflettet; Hamp; Rundflettet; Firkantflettet; Tre (forsterket / to lags); Tre (ett lags); Annet
cs: Typ konstrukce knotu: S jádrem (bavlněné); S jádrem (papírové); S jádrem (zinkové); Bez jádra; Ploché splétané; Konopné; Kulaté splétané; Čtvercové splétané; Dřevěné (dvouvrstvé); Dřevěné (jednovrstvé); Jiný
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije žice: S jezgrom (pamuk); S jezgrom (papir); S jezgrom (cink); Bez jezgre; Ravno pleteno; Konoplja; Okruglo pleteno; Kvadratno pleteno; Drveni (pojačani / dvoslojni); Drveni (jednoslojni); Ostalo
fi: Sydänlangan rakennetyyppi: Ytimellinen (puuvilla); Ytimellinen (paperi); Ytimellinen (sinkki); Sydämetön; Litteä punottu; Hamppu; Pyöreä punottu; Neliö punottu; Puinen (vahvistin / kaksikerroksinen); Puinen (yksikerroksinen); Muu
sv: Konstruktionstyp för veke: Med kärna (bomull); Med kärna (papper); Med kärna (zink); Utan kärna; Plattflätad; Hampa; Rundflätad; Fyrkantsflätad; Trä (booster/dubbelskikts); Trä (enkelskikts); Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie knôtu: S jadrom (bavlna); S jadrom (papier); S jadrom (zinok); Bez jadra; Ploché pletené; Konopné; Okrúhle pletené; Štvorcové pletené; Drevené (posilnené/dvojvrstvové); Drevené (jednovrstvové); Iné
pl: Typ konstrukcji knota: Z rdzeniem (bawełnianym); Z rdzeniem (papierowym); Z rdzeniem (cynkowym); Bez rdzenia; Płaski pleciony; Konopny; Okrągły pleciony; Kwadratowy pleciony; Drewniany (wzmocniony/dwuwarstwowy); Drewniany (jednowarstwowy); Inny
de: Machart des Dochts: Mit Kern (Baumwolle); Mit Kern (Papier); Mit Kern (Zink); Ohne Kern; Flach geflochten; Hanf; Rund geflochten; Quadratisch geflochten; Holz (Booster/Doppellagig); Holz (Einlagig); Andere
tr: Fitil yapı türü: Çekirdekli (pamuk); Çekirdekli (kağıt); Çekirdekli (çinko); Çekirdeksiz; Düz örgülü; Kenevir; Yuvarlak örgülü; Kare örgülü; Ahşap (destekli/çift katlı); Ahşap (tek katlı); Diğer
hu: Kanóc kialakítás típusa: Magvas (pamut); Magvas (papír); Magvas (cink); Mag nélküli; Laposra font; Kender; Kerekre font; Négyzetesen font; Fa (erősített/kétrétegű); Fa (egyrétegű); Egyéb
ja: ウィック構造タイプ: コア入り (コットン); コア入り (ペーパー); コア入り (亜鉛); コアレス; 平編み; ヘンプ; 丸編み; 角編み; 木製 (ブースター/2枚合わせ); 木製 (単層); その他
pt-PT: Tipo de construção do pavio: Com núcleo (algodão); Com núcleo (papel); Com núcleo (zinco); Sem núcleo; Entrançado plano; Cânhamo; Entrançado redondo; Entrançado quadrado; Madeira (reforço/camada dupla); Madeira (camada única); Outro
da: Konstruktionstype for væge: Med kerne (bomuld); Med kerne (papir); Med kerne (zink); Uden kerne; Fladflettet; Hamp; Rundflettet; Firkantflettet; Træ (booster/dobbeltlag); Træ (enkeltlag); Andet
nl: Type lontconstructie: Met kern (katoen); Met kern (papier); Met kern (zink); Zonder kern; Plat gevlochten; Hennep; Rond gevlochten; Vierkant gevlochten; Hout (booster/dubbellaags); Hout (enkellaags); Overig
zh-CN: 灯芯/烛芯结构类型: 有芯（棉）; 有芯（纸）; 有芯（锌）; 无芯; 扁平编织; 大麻纤维; 圆形编织; 方形编织; 木质（增强/双层）; 木质（单层）; 其他
vi: Kiểu kết cấu của bấc: Có lõi (bông); Có lõi (giấy); Có lõi (kẽm); Không lõi; Bện dẹt; Cây gai dầu; Bện tròn; Bện vuông; Bằng gỗ (tăng cường/hai lớp); Bằng gỗ (một lớp); Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta izdelave stenja: Z jedrom (bombaž); Z jedrom (papir); Z jedrom (cink); Brez jedra; Plosko pleteno; Konoplja; Okroglo pleteno; Kvadratno pleteno; Leseno (dvoslojno/ojačano); Leseno (enoslojno); Drugo
es: Tipo de construcción de la mecha: Con núcleo (algodón); Con núcleo (papel); Con núcleo (zinc); Sin núcleo; Trenzado plano; Cáñamo; Trenzado redondo; Trenzado cuadrado; Madera (refuerzo/doble capa); Madera (una sola capa); Otro
ko: 심지 구조 유형: 코어드(면); 코어드(종이); 코어드(아연); 코어리스; 평면 꼬임; 대마; 원형 꼬임; 사각형 꼬임; 목재(부스터/이겹); 목재(단일겹); 기타
el: Τύπος κατασκευής φυτιλιού: Με πυρήνα (βαμβακερό); Με πυρήνα (χάρτινο); Με πυρήνα (ψευδάργυρος); Χωρίς πυρήνα; Επίπεδη πλέξη; Κάνναβη; Στρογγυλή πλέξη; Τετράγωνη πλέξη; Ξύλινο (διπλής στρώσης); Ξύλινο (μονής στρώσης); Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de estrutura do pavio: Com núcleo (algodão); Com núcleo (papel); Com núcleo (zinco); Sem núcleo; Trançado chato; Cânhamo; Trançado redondo; Trançado quadrado; Madeira (reforço/camada dupla); Madeira (camada única); Outro
zh-TW: 燈芯結構類型: 有芯 (棉芯); 有芯 (紙芯); 有芯 (鋅芯); 無芯; 扁平編織; 大麻纖維; 圓形編織; 方形編織; 木質 (加強芯/雙層); 木質 (單層); 其他
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างไส้เทียน: มีแกน (ฝ้าย); มีแกน (กระดาษ); มีแกน (สังกะสี); ไร้แกน; ถักแบน; ป่าน; ถักกลม; ถักสี่เหลี่ยม; ไม้ (บูสเตอร์/สองชั้น); ไม้ (ชั้นเดียว); อื่นๆ
ru: Тип конструкции фитиля: С сердечником (хлопок); С сердечником (бумага); С сердечником (цинк); Без сердечника; Плоское плетение; Конопляный; Круглое плетение; Квадратное плетение; Деревянный (усиленный/двухслойный); Деревянный (однослойный); Другое
lt-LT: Dagties konstrukcijos tipas: Su šerdimi (medvilnė); Su šerdimi (popierius); Su šerdimi (cinkas); Be šerdies; Plokščio pynimo; Kanapių pluošto; Apvalaus pynimo; Kvadratinio pynimo; Medinis (sustiprintas / dviejų sluoksnių); Medinis (vieno sluoksnio); Kita
it: Tipo di costruzione dello stoppino: Con anima (cotone); Con anima (carta); Con anima (zinco); Senza anima; Treccia piatta; Canapa; Treccia tonda; Treccia quadrata; In legno (rinforzata/a due strati); In legno (a strato singolo); Altro